Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.281

Appeal procedure to be adopted—Inclusion of number and disposition of appeals in annual report.

The state auditor shall adopt appropriate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, to provide a procedure whereby a *taxing district may appeal charges levied under RCW 43.09.280. Such procedure shall provide for an administrative review process and an external review process which shall be advisory to the state auditor's office. The number of appeals and their disposition shall be included in the auditor's annual report.

[ 1982 c 206 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "Taxing district" was redesignated "local government" by 1995 c 301 s 18.